District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Teen Center Establishment Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 3c of the “Recreation Act of 1994,” effective March 23, 1995 (D.C. Law
10-246; D.C. Official Code §10-303) is amended as follows:
(a) A new section 4a is added to read as follows:
“(1) There is established the “D.C. Teen Center Fund” (“Fund”), which the

Department shall administer in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
Revenue deposited into the Fund account shall be expended by the Department for the
administration, improvement, and maintenance of property and programs managed by the
Department and shall supplement, but not replace, services provided by the Department.
“(2) The Fund shall be nonlapsing and may receive:
(A) Local appropriations;
(B) Federal grants; and
(C) Private donations, gifts, and other contributions.
“(c) Proceeds and money deposited into the Fund may be used solely for the purposes of
this section, including operations, staffing, maintenance, programming, and capital
improvements for the teen centers.
“(d) All fees collected and interest earned on funds shall not revert to the unrestricted
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any
other time.”.
(c) Section 5 is amended as follows:
“§10-305. Mega recreation centers and Teen centers.
“(a) The Mayor shall develop, construct, and implement mega recreation centers in
strategic locations throughout the District of Columbia. Such centers shall be spacious enough to
accommodate several indoor activities simultaneously and contain state of the art equipment and
apparatus.
“(b) The Department shall establish and operate a minimum of 4 comprehensive teen
centers, one located in each Quadrant across the District of Columbia.
“(c) Program Standards.

“Each teen center shall provide programming that incorporates evidence-based
prevention and intervention strategies, connects recreation to educational achievement, and
supports holistic youth development, including:
“(1) Recreation and Health (including a snack area or café offering healthy
refreshments, arcade, open recreational area, meditation, yoga, fitness, and wellness
programming);
“(2) Arts and Culture (including visual, digital, and performing arts, journalism
and creative writing, access to recording and production equipment);
“(3) Academic and Career Support (including tutoring, mentoring, study support,
financial literacy and career readiness, college preparation, and internship or apprenticeship
linkages);
“(4) Character Building (including leadership and development opportunities,
team-building and service-learning projects, programming supporting self-esteem, conflict
resolution, and positive relationships); and
“(5) Special Events (including regular themed activities and community events
such as art shows, open mic nights, video game tournaments, dance lessons, karaoke nights, and
other youth-led initiatives).
“(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, the services under this section shall
be applicable to count toward graduation requirements in accordance with section 2203.3(f) of
Title 5-A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (5-A DCMR § 2203.3(f)).
“(e) Centers shall be open during after-school hours, weekends, and school breaks
throughout the calendar year, or additional times as determined by the Youth Advisory Council
established in section 4 of this act.

“(f) All staff and volunteers shall undergo a mandatory minimum background check and
complete youth engagement and trauma-informed training.
“(g) The Department shall establish and maintain a minimum staff-to-teen supervision
ratio for safety and program quality. Each center shall not operate below the minimum staffing
level.”.
“(h)(1)(A) The Department shall establish a Youth Advisory Council for each center
composed primarily of D.C. youth and community stakeholders, to provide recommendations on
programming, policy, and operations.
“(B) Councils shall meet at least quarterly and provide recommendations
to the Director of the Department and to the Council Committee with jurisdiction over the
Department.
“(2) Youth Advisory Councils shall have decision-making authority regarding
center activities, events, art installations, and general facility rules as established in subsection
2(b) of section 3 of this act.”.
“(i) The Department shall submit an annual report to the Council and the Mayor
detailing:
100 “(1) The number and location of centers established;
101 “(2) Program participation rates and outcomes;
102 “(3) Financial statements for the Teen Center Fund; and
103 “(4) Recommendations for program expansion and improvement.”.
104 Sec. 7. Fiscal impact statement.
105 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
106 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,

107 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
108 Sec. 8. Effective date.
109 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
110 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
111 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
112 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
113 Columbia Register.